Wisconsin, session 2025, AB135.
do enact as follows:AB135,11Section 1. 218.0170 of the statutes is created to read:AB135,2,32218.0170 Right to repair motor vehicles. (1) Definitions. In this 3section:AB135,2,74(a) “Aftermarket part” means a part offered for sale or for installation in or on 5a motor vehicle after the motor vehicle has left the motor vehicle manufacturer’s 6production line. “Aftermarket part” does not include a piece of original equipment 7or part manufactured for a motor vehicle manufacturer.AB135,2,108(b) “Barrier” means a restriction that prohibits, makes more difficult, or 9tends to make more difficult the ability of a person to exercise a right under this 10section.AB135,2,1611(c) “Critical repair information and tools” means all necessary and 12compatibility information, tools, equipment, schematics, parts nomenclature and 13descriptions, parts catalogs, repair procedures, training materials, software, and 14technology, including information related to diagnostics, repair, service, and 15calibration or recalibration of parts and systems, used to return a motor vehicle to 16operational specifications.AB135,2,1717(d) “Distributor” has the meaning given in s. 218.0101 (6).AB135,2,1818(e) “Manufacturer” has the meaning given in s. 218.0101 (20).AB135,2,1919(f) “Motor vehicle” has the meaning given in s. 218.0101 (22).AB135,2,2020(g) “Motor vehicle dealer” has the meaning given in s. 218.0101 (23).AB135,3,11(h) “Motor vehicle equipment” has the meaning given in 49 USC 30102 (a) (8).AB135,3,42(i) “Motor vehicle repair facility” means a person that, in the ordinary course 3of its business, is engaged in the business of diagnosis, service, maintenance, 4repair, or calibration of motor vehicles or motor vehicle equipment.AB135,3,65(j) 1. Except as provided in subd. 2., “owner” means all of the following, as 6applicable:AB135,3,77a. A person who owns a motor vehicle, or his or her designee.AB135,3,88b. A lessee of a motor vehicle, or his or her designee.AB135,3,1192. “Owner” does not include a manufacturer, a person acting on behalf of a 10manufacturer, a motor vehicle financing company, a motor vehicle dealer, or a motor 11vehicle lessor.AB135,3,1412(k) “Remanufacturer” means a person who uses a standardized industrial 13process that returns previously sold, worn, or nonfunctional products to same-as-14new or better condition and performance, resulting in a fully warranted product.AB135,3,1715(L) “Service provider” means a designee of an owner or a designee of a motor 16vehicle repair facility that is employed by the owner or motor vehicle repair facility 17to assist with the diagnosis and repair of a motor vehicle.AB135,3,1818(m) “Specified legal barrier” means any of the following:AB135,3,20191. A request or requirement that an owner waive his or her right to use a 20motor vehicle repair facility of the owner’s choice.AB135,3,22212. Offering compensation or another incentive in exchange for an owner 22waiving his or her right to use a motor vehicle repair facility of the owner’s choice.AB135,4,223(n) “Technological barrier” means a technological restriction that prohibits, 1makes more difficult, or tends to make more difficult the ability of a person to 2exercise a right under this section.AB135,4,63(o) “Telematics system” means a system in a motor vehicle that collects 4information generated by the operation of the motor vehicle and, using wireless 5communication, transmits such information to a remote receiving point where it 6will be stored.AB135,4,117(p) “Vehicle-generated data” means direct, real-time, in-vehicle data 8generated by the operation of a motor vehicle that is related to the diagnostics, 9repair, service, wear, and calibration or recalibration of parts and systems required 10to maintain or return the motor vehicle to operational specifications in compliance 11with federal motor vehicle safety and emissions laws, regulations, and standards.AB135,4,1312(2) Manufacturer barriers prohibited. A manufacturer may not employ a 13technological barrier or specified legal barrier that impairs any of the following:AB135,4,1614(a) The ability of an owner to access his or her motor vehicle’s vehicle-15generated data that the manufacturer is required to make available under sub. (3) 16(a) and (b).AB135,4,2017(b) The ability of an owner, an aftermarket parts manufacturer, an 18aftermarket parts remanufacturer, a motor vehicle equipment manufacturer, a 19motor vehicle repair facility, a distributor, or a service provider to access critical 20repair information and tools made available in accordance with sub. (3) (c).AB135,4,2221(c) The ability of an owner to use a motor vehicle towing provider or service 22provider of the owner’s choice.AB135,5,323(d) The ability of an aftermarket parts manufacturer, an aftermarket parts 1remanufacturer, a motor vehicle equipment manufacturer, a motor vehicle repair 2facility, a distributor, or a service provider to produce or offer compatible 3aftermarket parts.AB135,5,54(e) The ability of an owner to diagnose, repair, and maintain his or her motor 5vehicle in the same manner as would a manufacturer or motor vehicle dealer.AB135,5,96(3) Data, information, and tool access. (a) A manufacturer shall provide 7to owners of the motor vehicles it manufactures access to vehicle-generated data 8without restriction, limitation, fee, license, or requiring use of a device mandated by 9the manufacturer to decrypt the vehicle-generated data.AB135,5,1310(b) If a manufacturer uses wireless technology or a telematics system to 11transmit vehicle-generated data, the manufacturer shall provide access to the 12vehicle-generated data as required under par. (a) and in a direct and wireless 13method through a standardized access platform.AB135,5,1914(c) A manufacturer shall provide to the owners, aftermarket parts 15manufacturers, aftermarket parts remanufacturers, motor vehicle equipment 16manufacturers, motor vehicle repair facilities, distributors, and service providers of 17the motor vehicles it manufactures access to critical repair information and tools 18related to the motor vehicles it manufactures without restriction or limitation and 19at a fair, reasonable, and nondiscriminatory cost.AB135,6,220(4) Manufacturer mandates prohibited. Except for recall and warranty 21repairs, a manufacturer may not, within repair or maintenance service procedures, 22recommendations, service bulletins, repair manuals, position statements, or other 1similar repair or maintenance guidelines that are distributed to owners or 2professional repairers, do any of the following:AB135,6,43(a) Mandate, or imply a mandate for, the use of any particular brand or 4manufacturer of parts, tools, or equipment.AB135,6,95(b) Recommend the use of any particular brand or manufacturer of parts, 6tools, or equipment, unless the manufacturer provides a prominent notice 7immediately following the recommendation, in the same font used in the 8recommendation and in a font size no smaller than the font size used in the 9recommendation, that states the following:AB135,6,1110NOTICE: Vehicle owners can choose which repair parts, tools, and equipment 11to purchase and should carefully consider their options.AB135,6,1512(5) Cybersecurity. Nothing in this section shall be construed to preclude a 13manufacturer from employing a cryptographic or technological protection 14necessary to secure motor vehicles, vehicle-generated data, or safety-critical vehicle 15systems from an unintended audience.AB135,6,1916(6) Designee count. A person that manages access to a motor vehicle’s 17vehicle-generated data transmitted by a standardized access platform may not limit 18the number or types of persons that a person who owns or leases a motor vehicle 19may designate as his or her designee.AB135,7,220(7) Contracts void. In regard to a contract or arrangement entered into, 21renewed, or modified on or after the effective date of this subsection .... [LRB inserts 22date], a term, provision, agreement, or language in the contract or arrangement 1that waives, avoids, restricts, or limits the manufacturer’s obligations under this 2section is void and unenforceable.AB135,7,63(8) Penalty. A manufacturer that violates sub. (2), (3), or (4) shall be subject 4to a forfeiture not to exceed $10,000 per violation. Each act prohibited or required 5by sub. (2), (3), or (4) shall constitute a separate violation. Each day that a 6manufacturer knowingly violates sub. (2), (3), or (4) constitutes a separate violation.AB135,7,77